Alabama, session 2026rs, HB430.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF ALABAMA:
Section 1. (a) The Judge of Probate of Montgomery
County may conduct fundraising events, including, but not
limited to, rodeos and may use the proceeds and profits from
the events for any lawful purpose relating to the operation of
the office of the judge of probate.
(b) This section is remedial and curative and any
actions taken by the judge of probate in conformance with
subsection (a) are ratified and confirmed.
Section 2. This act shall become effective immediately.
Page 1

Section 2. This act shall become effective immediately.
HB430 Enrolled










________________________________________________
Speaker of the House of Representatives



________________________________________________
President and Presiding Officer of the Senate


House of Representatives

I hereby certify that the within Act originated in and
was passed by the House 05-Mar-26.

John Treadwell
Clerk





Senate 17-Mar-26 Passed



Page 2